New Jersey, session 222, S479.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) A construction contract entered into pursuant to the "Local Public Contracts Law," P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-1 et seq.), shall allow the contractor to pay any enforcing agency fees imposed pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.), by way of a card payment system or electronic funds transfer system established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1995, c.325 (C.40A:5-45). 2.    Section 3 of P.L.1995, c.325 (C.40A:5-45) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Subject to the provisions of sections 5 and 6 of P.L.1995, c.325 (C.40A:5-47 and C.2B:1-5), a local unit [may] shall establish a card payment system [or] and electronic funds transfer system [upon] for payments required to be made under the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.), and may establish a card payment system or electronic funds transfer system for other purposes.  A local unit shall establish a card payment system or electronic funds transfer system by passage of a resolution of the governing body.  The resolution shall specify those types of charges, taxes, fees, assessments, fines, or other obligations approved for card based or electronic funds transfer payment, except that credit card payment shall not be authorized for the payment of delinquent local unit obligations or for the redemption of local unit liens. (cf: P.L.1995, c.325, s.3) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.